Hawaii statutes.
§334-60.5 Hearing on petition. (a)
The court may adjourn or continue a hearing for failure to timely notify a
spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, guardian, relative, or other person
determined by the court to be entitled to notice, or for failure by the subject
to contact an attorney as provided in section 334-60.4(b)(7) if the court
determines the interests of justice so require.

(b) The time and form of the procedure
incident to hearing the issues in the petition shall be provided by court
rule. Unless the hearing is waived, the judge shall hear the petition as soon
as possible and no later than ten days after the date the petition is filed
unless a reasonable delay is sought for good cause shown by the subject of the
petition, the subject's attorney, or those persons entitled to receive notice
of the hearing under section 334-60.4.

(c) The subject of the petition shall be
present at all hearings unless the subject waives the right to be present, is
unable to attend, or creates conditions which make it impossible to conduct the
hearing in a reasonable manner as determined by the judge. A waiver is valid
only upon acceptance by the court following a judicial determination that the
subject understands the subject's rights and is competent to waive them, or is
unable to participate. If the subject is unable to participate, the judge
shall appoint a guardian ad litem or a temporary guardian as provided in
article V of chapter 560, to represent the subject throughout the proceedings.

(d) [Repeal and reenactment on July 1,
2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] Hearings may be held at any convenient
place within the circuit. The subject of the petition, any interested party,
or the court on its own motion may request a hearing in another circuit because
of convenience to the parties, witnesses, or the court or because of the
individual's mental or physical condition.

(e) The attorney general, the attorney general's
deputy, special deputy, or appointee shall present the case for hearings
convened under this chapter, except that the attorney general, the attorney
general's deputy, special deputy, or appointee need not participate in or be
present at a hearing whenever a petitioner or some other appropriate person has
retained private counsel who will be present in court and will present to the
court the case for involuntary hospitalization.

(f) Counsel for the subject of the petition
shall be allowed adequate time for investigation of the matters at issue and
for preparation, and shall be permitted to present the evidence that the
counsel believes necessary to a proper disposition of the proceedings,
including evidence as to alternatives to inpatient hospitalization.

(g) No individual may be found to require
treatment in a psychiatric facility unless at least one physician, advanced
practice registered nurse, or psychologist who has personally examined the
individual testifies in person at the hearing. This testimony may be waived by
the subject of the petition. If the subject of the petition has refused to be
examined by a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
psychologist, the subject may be examined by a court-appointed licensed
physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or psychologist. If the subject
refuses and there is sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the
petition are true, the court may make a temporary order committing the subject
to a psychiatric facility for a period of not more than five days for the
purpose of a diagnostic examination and evaluation. The subject's refusal
shall be treated as a denial that the subject is mentally ill or suffering from
substance abuse. Nothing in this section, however, shall limit the
individual's privilege against self-incrimination.

(h) The subject of the petition in a hearing
under this section has the right to secure an independent medical or
psychological evaluation and present evidence thereon.

(i) [Repeal and reenactment on July 1,
2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] If after hearing all relevant evidence,
including the result of any diagnostic examination ordered by the court, the
court finds that an individual is not a person requiring medical, psychiatric,
psychological, or other rehabilitative treatment or supervision, the court
shall order that the individual be discharged if the individual has been
hospitalized prior to the hearing.

(j) [Repeal and reenactment on July 1,
2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] If the court finds that the criteria
for involuntary hospitalization under section 334-60.2(1) has been met beyond a
reasonable doubt and that the criteria under sections 334-60.2(2) and
334-60.2(3) have been met by clear and convincing evidence, the court may issue
an order to any law enforcement officer to deliver the subject to a facility
that has agreed to admit the subject as an involuntary patient, or if the
subject is already a patient in a psychiatric facility, authorize the facility
to retain the patient for treatment for a period of ninety days unless sooner
discharged. The court may also authorize the involuntary administration of
medication, where the subject has an existing order for assisted community
treatment, issued pursuant to part VIII of this chapter, relating to assisted
community treatment, and in accordance with the treatment prescribed by that prior
order. An order of commitment shall specify which of those persons served with
notice pursuant to section 334-60.4, together with such other persons as the
court may designate, shall be entitled to receive any subsequent notice of
intent to discharge, transfer, or recommit. The court shall forward to the
Hawaii criminal justice data center all orders of involuntary civil commitment
or information from all orders of involuntary civil commitment, as requested by
the Hawaii criminal justice data center, which in turn shall forward the
information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or its successor agency,
for inclusion in the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
database. The orders or information shall also be
maintained by the Hawaii criminal justice data center for disclosure to and use
by law enforcement officials for the purpose of firearms permitting or
registration pursuant to chapter 134. This subsection shall apply to
all involuntary civil commitments without regard to the date of the involuntary
civil commitment.

(k) [Repeal and reenactment on July 1,
2020. L 2013, c 221, §24.] The court may find that the subject of
the petition is an incapacitated or protected person, or both, under article V
of chapter 560, and may appoint a guardian or conservator, or both, for the
subject under the terms and conditions as the court shall determine. [L 1984, c
188, pt of §3; am L 1985, c 220, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c 58, §3; am L
1997, c 383, §47; am L 2004, c 161, §8; am L 2013, c 221, §6 and c 232, §4; am
L 2014, c 87, §4; am L 2015, c 27, §4]

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next